Utah statutes.
72-10-413.   Purchase or condemnation of air rights or navigation easements.
A political subdivision within which the property or nonconforming use is
located or the political subdivision owning the airport or served by it may
acquire, by purchase, grant, or condemnation in the manner provided by the law
under which political subdivisions are authorized to acquire real property for
public purposes, an air right, navigation easement, or other estate or
interest in the property or nonconforming structure or use in question if:
(1)  it is desired to remove, lower, or otherwise terminate a nonconforming
structure or use;
(2)  the approach protection necessary cannot, because of constitutional
limitations, be provided by airport zoning regulations under this part; or
(3)  it appears advisable that the necessary approach protection be provided
by acquisition of property rights rather than by airport zoning regulations.
